Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB309.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15A.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall have the following departments:
(a) Department of Corrections;
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training, which shall have the following
divisions:
1. Training Operations Division; and
2. Administrative Division;
(c) Department of Juvenile Justice, which shall have the following offices and
divisions:
1. [Office of Program Operations, which shall have the following
divisions:
a. Division of Western Region;
b. Division of Eastern Region; and
c. Division of Placement Services;
2. ]Office of Support Services, which shall have the following divisions:
a. Division of Administrative Services;
b. [Division of Program Services; and
c. ]Division of Professional Development;
c. Division of Placement Services;
d. Division of Education; and
e. Division of Health Services[
3. Office of Community and Mental Health Services, which shall have the
following division:
a. Division of Community and Mental Health Services];
2.[4.] Office of Detention, which shall require that all detention centers report
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
to one (1) supervisor who reports directly to the commissioner, and
which shall have the following division:
a. Division of Transportation;[ and]
3. Office of Rehabilitation and Reentry Services, which shall have the
following divisions:
a. Division of Youth Development Centers;
b. Division of Group Homes;
c. Division of Community Services; and
d. Division of Reentry; and
4.[5.] Division of Compliance;
(d) Department of Kentucky State Police, which shall have the following offices
and divisions:
1. Office of Administrative Services, which shall be headed by an
executive director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the
commissioner;
a. Division of Operational Support, which shall be headed by a
director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Administrative Services; and
b. Division of Management Services, which shall be headed by a
director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Administrative Services;
2. Office of Operations, which shall be headed by an executive director
who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the commissioner;
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
a. Division of West Troops, which shall be headed by a director who
shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive
director of the Office of Operations;
b. Division of East Troops, which shall be headed by a director who
shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of
Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive
director of the Office of Operations;
c. Division of Special Enforcement, which shall be headed by a
director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Operations; and
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement, which shall be
headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner
of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report
to the executive director of the Office of Operations; and
3. Office of Technical Services, which shall be headed by an executive
director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department
of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the commissioner;
a. Division of Forensic Services, which shall be headed by a director
who shall have a minimum of a bachelor's degree in a natural
science and at least seven (7) years of experience in an accredited
forensic laboratory, who shall be appointed by the commissioner
of the Department of Kentucky State Police, and who shall report
to the executive director of the Office of Technical Services;
b. Division of Electronic Services, which shall be headed by a
director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Technical Services; and
c. Division of Records Management, which shall be headed by a
director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the
Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Technical Services; and
(e) Department of Public Advocacy, which shall have the following divisions:
1. Protection and Advocacy Division;
2. Division of Law Operations;
3. Division of Trial Services;
4. Division of Post-Trial Services;
5. Division of Conflict and Contract Services; and
6. Division of Education, Strategic Planning, and Recruitment.
(2) Each department, except for the Department of Public Advocacy, shall be headed
by a commissioner who shall be appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public
Safety Cabinet with the approval of the Governor as required by KRS 12.040. Each
commissioner shall be directly responsible to the secretary and shall have[ such]
functions, powers, and duties as provided by law and as the secretary may
prescribe. The Department of Public Advocacy shall be headed by the public
advocate, appointed as required by KRS 31.020, who shall be directly responsible
to the Public Advocacy Commission. The Department of Public Advocacy is an
independent state agency which shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety
Cabinet for administrative purposes only. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
shall not have control over the Department of Public Advocacy's information
technology equipment and use unless granted access by court order.
(3) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall have the following offices and
divisions:
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
(a) Office of the Secretary, which shall be headed by a deputy secretary
appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 and responsible for the direct
administrative support for the secretary and other duties as assigned by the
secretary, and which, with the approval of the secretary, may employ[ such]
staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the
office;
(b) Office of Human Resource Management, which shall be headed by an
executive director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible
to and report to the secretary and be responsible for all matters relating to
human resources, and who, with the approval of the secretary, may employ[
such] staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities
of the office;
1. Division of Human Resource Administration, which shall be headed by
a director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Human Resource Management; and
2. Division of Employee Management, which shall be headed by a director
appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the executive
director of the Office of Human Resource Management;
(c) Office of Legal Services, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 and 12.210, that:
1. Shall provide legal representation and services for the cabinet; and
2. May investigate all complaints regarding the facilities, staff, treatment
of juveniles, and other matters relating to the operation of the Justice
and Public Safety Cabinet. If it appears that there is a violation of
statutes, administrative regulations, policies, court decisions, the rights
of juveniles who are subject to the orders of the department, or any other
matter relating to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the office shall
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
report to the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet who
shall, if required, refer the matter to a law enforcement agency,
Commonwealth's attorney, county attorney, the Attorney General, or
federal agencies, as appropriate. The office may be used to investigate
matters in which there is a suspicion of violation of written policy,
administrative regulation, or statutory law within the Department of
Public Advocacy only when the investigation will have no prejudicial
impact upon a person who has an existing attorney-client relationship
with the Department of Public Advocacy. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this subparagraph, investigation and discipline of KRS
Chapter 16 personnel shall continue to be conducted by the Department
of Kentucky State Police pursuant to KRS Chapter 16. The office shall
conduct no other investigations under the authority granted in this
subparagraph. The secretary may, by administrative order, assign the
investigative functions in this subparagraph to a branch within the
office.
The executive director shall be directly responsible to and report to the
secretary and, with the approval of the secretary, may employ[ such] attorneys
appointed pursuant to KRS 12.210 and other staff as necessary to perform the
duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;
(d) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services, which shall be headed
by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be
responsible for all matters relating to the provision of support to the Criminal
Justice Council, legislative liaison services, and functions and duties vested in
the Criminal Justice Council as described in KRS 15A.030. The executive
director shall be directly responsible to and report to the secretary and may
employ[ such] staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
responsibilities of the office;
(e) Office of Communications, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet pursuant to
KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible to report to the secretary and be
responsible for all matters relating to communications, and who, with the
approval of the secretary, may employ[ such] staff as necessary to perform the
duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;
1. Information and Technology Services Division, which shall be headed
by a director appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety
Cabinet pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the executive
director of the Office of Communications;
(f) Office of Financial Management Services, which shall be headed by an
executive director appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety
Cabinet pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible to report to the
secretary and be responsible for all matters relating to fiscal functions, and
who, with the approval of the secretary, may employ[ such] staff as necessary
to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;
1. Division of Financial Management, which shall be headed by a director
appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet
pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the executive director of the
Office of Financial Management Services;
(g) Grants Management Division, which shall be headed by a director appointed
by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet pursuant to KRS
12.050 who shall be responsible to report to the secretary and be responsible
for all matters relating to state and federal grants management, and who, with
the approval of the secretary, may employ[ such] staff as necessary to perform
the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner, which shall be headed by a
chief medical examiner appointed pursuant to KRS 72.240 who shall be
responsible for all matters relating to forensic pathology and forensic
toxicology and other duties as assigned by the secretary. The executive
director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 shall be responsible for all matters
related to the administrative support of the Office of the State Medical
Examiner. The executive director shall report directly to the secretary and
with the approval of the secretary may employ[ such] administrative support
staff as necessary to perform the administrative duties, functions, and
responsibilities of the office. The chief medical examiner shall be directly
responsible to and report to the secretary and may employ[ such] staff as
necessary to perform the forensic duties, functions, and responsibilities of the
office; and
(i) Office of Drug Control Policy, which shall be headed by an executive director
appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible for all matters
relating to the research, coordination, and execution of drug control policy
and for the management of state and federal grants, including but not limited
to the prevention and treatment related to substance abuse. By December 31
of each year, the Office of Drug Control Policy shall review, approve, and
coordinate all current projects of any substance abuse program which is
conducted by or receives funding through agencies of the executive branch.
This oversight shall extend to all substance abuse programs which are
principally related to the prevention or treatment, or otherwise targeted at the
reduction, of substance abuse in the Commonwealth. The Office of Drug
Control Policy shall promulgate administrative regulations consistent with
enforcing this oversight authority. The executive director shall be directly
responsible to and report to the secretary and may employ[ such] staff as
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office.
Section 2. KRS 15A.064 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall establish in each county, or assign to an
existing body the responsibilities of, a local juvenile restorative justice advisory
committee. For counties within the same judicial district, the requirements of this
subsection may be satisfied through a joint committee.
(2) The membership of each committee shall include the following:
(a) The Chief District Judge;
(b) The county attorney;
(c) An assistant public advocate;
(d) A representative from the Department for Community Based Services;
(e) A representative from the Department of Juvenile Justice;
(f) A representative from a local law enforcement agency;
(g) A representative from each local school district;
(h) Community members reflecting the racial, socioeconomic, and other diversity
of the county or, in the case of a joint committee, the counties; and
(i) A representative from a victims advocacy group.
(3) Each committee shall:
(a) Establish sustainable programs that employ restorative practices to identify
the underlying causes of negative behavior and empower children, families,
and communities to address and prevent issues surrounding incidents of
negative behavior; and
(b) Develop and implement local restorative justice programs with an established
organization to serve children, youth, and families through referrals from the
court, the court-designated worker, the Department of Juvenile Justice, public
schools, or other social service agencies, or upon request of a child or family.
(4) Restorative justice programs established pursuant to this section shall not allow
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2386
participation by a child accused or adjudicated of an offense which would classify
him or her as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401.
(5) Each committee shall meet at least quarterly, and shall report to the Department of
Juvenile Justice[, Office of Community and Mental Health Services].
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed